Arkansas, session 2025, HB1892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-4-202, concerning customer billing and
statements for water, gas, or electricity, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d) Rates for sales of electricity by a public utility furnishing
electricity to the general public in this state shall not discriminate
against a customer that owns or operates a nonexport facility as defined in §
23-18-111 in comparison to rates for sales to other customers served by the
electric utility.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-18-111. Nonexport facility — Definition — Rules.
(a) As used in this section, "nonexport facility" means a facility for
the production of electrical energy to meet all or part of a customer's need
*ANS365*
03/21/2025 2:57:47 PM ANS365

HB1892
for electrical energy within a single electric utility's allocated service
territory that does not intentionally feed electricity back to the electric
utility.
(b)(1) On or before December 31, 2025, following notice, opportunity
for public comment, and a hearing, the Arkansas Public Service Commission
shall promulgate appropriate rules for a nonexport facility.
(2) The rules promulgated under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall include without limitation:
(A) Standards for the safe, reliable, and acceptable
operation of a nonexport facility, including:
(i) Thermal, service voltage, power quality, or
network limits associated with inadvertent export events; and
(ii) Acceptable methods of export limitation,
including:
(a) Power control systems;
(b) Reverse power protection; and
(c) Minimum power protection; and
(B) An expedited review process for:
(i) Evaluating and approving acceptable export
control methods and requirements for a nonexport facility; and
(ii) Interconnection.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-18-603(9), concerning the definition of
"net-metering facility" used under the Arkansas Cost-Shifting Prevention Act
of 2023, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(G) Does not include a nonexport facility as defined in §
23-18-111.









03/21/2025 2:57:47 PM ANS365